Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 13. Middlebury Incorporated School District No. 4

§ 13-1.
Incorporation of district.

School District No. 4 in Middlebury, in the County of Addison, a corporation duly established under the laws of this State, is hereby empowered and required to educate the scholars in the District in a grade 1 school or schools; and for that purpose may
sell and convey any real estate belonging to the District, purchase, build, lease, and hold as many schoolhouses or school rooms, and establish and keep as many schools, and cause to be taught therein as extended a course of study
as the District shall direct.

§ 13-2.
Merger of districts.

In order that a competent number of schools shall be maintained in the Town of Middlebury, for the convenient instruction of youth, School District No. 4 in Middlebury, in the County of Addison, an incorporated school district established by Act No. 89
of the laws of 1866, is empowered to merge with the Town School District of Middlebury, provided a majority of the legal voters of the Town School District of Middlebury present and voting at any meeting legally warned of the Town
School District of Middlebury vote to become a part of School District No 4. in Middlebury, and a majority of the legal voters of School District No. 4 in Middlebury present and voting at any meeting legally warned of School District
No. 4 in Middlebury vote to accept the merger. If the merger occurs, School District No. 4 in Middlebury shall retain all its present corporate powers and shall continue its corporate existence heretofore granted, and the Town School
District of Middlebury shall no longer exist except for the settlement of its own pecuniary affairs and for the purpose only of voting, assessing, and collecting of a special tax annually to pay its indebtedness, if any, which settlement
and payment shall be made before the expiration of two years from the date of the vote of School District No. 4 in Middlebury accepting the merger.

§ 13-3.
Transfer of real estate.

The Town School District is hereby authorized and empowered when the merger occurs to transfer and assign to School District No. 4 in Middlebury all right title and interest or use in any estate, real or personal, wherever situate, and from whatever source
derived appertaining or belonging to the Town School District of Middlebury, provided said present School District of Middlebury so votes by a majority of its legal voters present and voting at a meeting thereof legally warned.

§ 13-4.
Records of Town School District.

The records of the Middlebury Town School District shall be deposited with the Town Clerk when said merger occurs.

§ 13-5.
School funds; State aid.

If the merger occurs, School District No. 4 in Middlebury shall be entitled to all the public money distributed to Middlebury and to all State aid granted to the town of Middlebury and provisions heretofore granted to the District inconsistent with this
section shall be repealed.

§ 13-6.
Adoption of rules and regulations.

The Incorporated School District may make all such necessary rules and regulations in regard to the attendance of scholars, and the course of instruction in the school or schools, as shall not be inconsistent with the laws of this State.

§ 13-7.
Acceptance of scholars.

The Prudential Committee of the Incorporated School District may admit scholars coming from outside the District upon such terms as they may prescribe.

§ 13-8.
Officers and Prudential Committee.

The officers of the Incorporated School District shall be a Moderator, a Clerk, a Treasurer, a Collector, and an Auditor, who shall be chosen annually, and a Prudential Committee of seven hereafter to be chosen as follows:

At each annual meeting of the Town of Middlebury, there shall be elected a member of the Committee for a term of three years. A vacancy on the Committee shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by a majority of the members of the Committee.
All elected officers shall be elected by Australian ballot, chosen from the legally qualified voters of the Town, and shall hold their respective offices until their successors are elected and qualified.

§ 13-9.
General provisions.

The general provisions of law pertaining to schools not inconsistent with the provisions of law pertaining to this charter and with the rights heretofore granted School District No. 4 by special legislation shall apply to school District No. 4 when the
merger occurs.